Washington statutes.
RCW 18.138.040

Certification—Application procedures, requirements, fees.

(1) If the applicant meets the qualifications as outlined in RCW 18.138.030(2), the secretary shall confer on such candidates the title certified dietitian.

(2) If the applicant meets the qualifications as outlined in RCW 18.138.030(4), the secretary shall confer on such candidates the title certified nutritionist.

(3) Applicants for certification as a certified dietitian or certified nutritionist shall comply with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees determined by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

[ 1996 c 191 s 84; 1991 c 3 s 281; 1988 c 277 s 4.]